North Dakota, session 69, HB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-04-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-04-10. Special plates for amateur radio station licenseholders.
Owners of motor vehicles required to be registered under subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of
section 39-04-19, who hold an unrevoked and unexpired official amateur radio station license issued by
the federal communications commission, Washington, D.C., may receive special plates. The plates will
be issued upon application to the department, accompanied by proof of ownership of the amateur radio
station license, compliance with the state motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of
motor vehicles, and payment of the regular license fee, as prescribed under the North Dakota motor
vehicle laws. The special plates will be issued in lieu of the plates ordinarily issued, and must have
inscribed on themthe plates the official amateur radio call letters of the applicant as assigned by the
federal communications commission and the the words "AMATEUR RADIO". Applicants under this
section may apply for up to five plates with the same call letters. The department shall add an additional
ascending number from two to five to each subsequent plate issued to the same applicant under this
section.

H. B. NO. 1327 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1327.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 35 Nays 12 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State